Washington statutes.
RCW 26.38.020

Limitation on applicability—2022 c 88.

Chapter 88, Laws of 2022 does not apply to custody of an Indian child, as defined in the Indian child welfare act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903, as amended, to the extent custody is governed by the Indian child welfare act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. Secs. 1901 through 1963, as amended.

[ 2022 c 88 s 103.]